Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3974
Violation; restraining order or injunction; prohibited acts; penalty; county attorney; duties.

(1) The department may apply for a restraining order or a temporary or permanent injunction against any person violating or threatening to violate the Nebraska Milk Act or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act in order to insure compliance with the provisions thereof. The district court of the county where the violation is occurring or is about to occur shall have jurisdiction to grant such relief upon good cause shown. Relief may be granted notwithstanding the existence of other remedies at law and shall be granted without bond.

(2) Any person violating the act or who impedes, obstructs, hinders, or otherwise prevents or attempts to prevent the director in the performance of his or her duties in connection with the enforcement of the act or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department is guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

(3) It shall be the duty of the county attorney of the county in which violations of the act are occurring or are about to occur, when notified of such violations or threatened violations by the department, to cause appropriate proceedings under subsection (1) of this section to be instituted and pursued in the district court without delay.

Laws 1980, LB 632, § 9;

Laws 1986, LB 900, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1997), § 2-3909;

Laws 2007, LB111, § 10.